District of Columbia statutes.
28-4510

Judgment in favor of the District of Columbia as prima facie evidence.

A final judgment or decree determining that a person has violated this chapter in an action brought by the District of Columbia under section 28-4506 , other than a consent judgment or decree entered before any testimony at trial has been taken or entered pursuant to a plea of nolo contendere, shall be prima facie evidence against such person in any other action against such person under section 28-4508 or 28-4509 as to all matters with respect to which the judgment or decree would be an estoppel between the parties to that judgment or decree.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368

History

1981 Ed., § 28-4510.

Prior Codifications